Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-103 Scope. This part shall
apply to all types of direct insurance, but shall not apply to the following:

(1) Life, annuity, or accident and health or sickness
insurance;

(2) Mortgage guaranty, financial guaranty, or any
other forms of insurance offering protection against investment risks;

(3) Fidelity or surety bonds, or any other bonding
obligations;

(4) Credit insurance, vendors' single interest
insurance, collateral protection insurance, or any similar insurance protecting
the interests of a creditor arising out of a creditor-debtor transaction;

(5) Insurance of warranties or service contracts,
including insurance that provides for the repair, replacement, or service of
goods or property, for indemnification for the repair, replacement, or service
for the operational or structural failure of the goods or property due to a
defect in materials, artisanship, or normal wear and tear, or for reimbursement
for the liability incurred by the issuer of agreements or service contracts
that provide those benefits;

(6) Title insurance;

(7) Ocean marine insurance;

(8) Any transaction or combination of transactions
between a person (including affiliates of the person) and an insurer (including
affiliates of the insurer) that involves the transfer of investment or credit
risk unaccompanied by transfer of insurance risk; or

(9) Any insurance provided by or guaranteed by
government. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2000, c 93, §2; am L 2002, c 155,
§89; am L 2003, c 212, §111]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next